root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.affix
   číT    > -íT,ALI
   číT    > -íT,ALY
   [^D]ěT    > -ěT,íM
   [^D]ěT    > -ěT,íš
   [^D]ěT    > -ěT,í
   [^D]ěT    > -ěT,íME
   [^D]ěT    > -ěT,íTE
   [^DNT]ěT    > -T,J
   [^DNT]ěT    > -T,JME
   [^DNT]ěT    > -T,JTE
   ěDěT    > -ěDěT,íM
   ěDěT    > -ěDěT,íš
   ěDěT    > -ěDěT,í
   ěDěT    > -ěDěT,íME
   ěDěT    > -ěDěT,íTE
   ěDěT    > -ěT,í
   ěDěT    > -DěT,Z
   ěDěT    > -DěT,ZME
   ěDěT    > -DěT,ZTE
   áDěT    > -T,J
   áDěT    > -T,JME
   áDěT    > -T,JTE
   [^ě]DěT    > -ěT,íM
   [^ě]DěT    > -ěT,íš
   [^ě]DěT    > -ěT,í
   [^ě]DěT    > -ěT,íME
   [^ě]DěT    > -ěT,íTE
   [^áě]DěT    > -DěT,ď
   [^áě]DěT    > -DěT,ďTE
   [^áě]DěT    > -DěT,ďME
   TěT    > -TěT,ť
   TěT    > -TěT,ťME
   TěT    > -TěT,ťTE
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NěT    > -ěT,I
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NěT    > -ěT,ěME
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NěT    > -ěT,ěTE
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NěT    > -NěT,ň
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NěT    > -NěT,ňME
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][LR]NěT    > -NěT,ňTE
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěLR]NěT    > -ěT,I
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěLR]NěT    > -ěT,ěME
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěLR]NěT    > -ěT,ěTE
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NěT    > -NěT,ň
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NěT    > -NěT,ňME
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NěT    > -NěT,ňTE
   ET    > -ET,íM
   ET    > -ET,íš
   ET    > -ET,í
   ET    > -ET,íME
   ET    > -ET,íTE
   ET    > -T,
   ET    > -ET,íC
   ET    > -ET,íCE
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]ET    > -ET,I
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]ET    > -T,ME
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]ET    > E
   [áéíóúýů][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]ET    > -T,J
   [áéíóúýů][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]ET    > -T,JME
   [áéíóúýů][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]ET    > -T,JTE
   [AEIOUYěRL][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]ET    > -ET,
   [AEIOUYěRL][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]ET    > -ET,ME
   [AEIOUYěRL][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]ET    > -ET,TE
   ěT    > -T,
   ěT    > -ěT,íC
   ěT    > -ěT,íCE
   NOUT    > -OUT,U
   NOUT    > -OUT,Eš
   NOUT    > -OUT,E
   NOUT    > -OUT,EME
   NOUT    > -OUT,ETE
   NOUT    > -T,
   NOUT    > -OUT,A
   NOUT    > -T,C
   NOUT    > -T,CE
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -NOUT,ň
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -NOUT,ňME
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -NOUT,ňTE
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -OUT,I
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -OUT,ěME
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -OUT,ěTE
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NOUT    > -NOUT,ň
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NOUT    > -NOUT,ňME
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]NOUT    > -NOUT,ňTE
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -OUT,I
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -OUT,ěME
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -OUT,ěTE
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -OUT,UL
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -OUT,ULA
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -OUT,ULO
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -OUT,ULI
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě][RL]NOUT    > -OUT,ULY
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RNOUT    > -NOUT,L
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RNOUT    > -NOUT,LA
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RNOUT    > -NOUT,LO
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RNOUT    > -NOUT,LI
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]RNOUT    > -NOUT,LY
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůěR][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL][^AEIOUY]    > -NOUT,L
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůěR][^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -NOUT,L
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůě]L[^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -OUT,UL
   L[^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -NOUT,L
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -NOUT,LA
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -NOUT,LO
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -NOUT,LI
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýůěRL]NOUT    > -NOUT,LY
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůěL]NOUT    > -OUT,UL
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůěL]NOUT    > -OUT,ULA
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůěL]NOUT    > -OUT,ULO
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůěL]NOUT    > -OUT,ULI
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýůěL]NOUT    > -OUT,ULY
   N    > A
   N    > O
   N    > I
   N    > Y
   YT    > A
   YT    > O
   YT    > I
   YT    > Y
   [^O]UT    > A
   [^O]UT    > O
   [^O]UT    > I
   [^O]UT    > Y
   [^COY]T    > I
   CT    > -T,I

flag *T:
   [^AIOUYíýCSZ]T    > -T,N
   [^AIOUYíýCSZ]T    > -T,NA
   [^AIOUYíýCSZ]T    > -T,NO
   [^AIOUYíýCSZ]T    > -T,NI
   [^AIOUYíýCSZ]T    > -T,NY
   [^AIOUYíýCSZ]T    > -T,NU
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčEN
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčENA
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčENO
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčENI
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčENY
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčENU
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčEN
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčENA
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčENO
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčENI
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčENY
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčENU
   áST    > -áST,ADEN
   áST    > -áST,ADENA
   áST    > -áST,ADENO
   áST    > -áST,ADENI
   áST    > -áST,ADENY
   áST    > -áST,ADENU
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETEN
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETENA
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETENO
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETENI
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETENY
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETENU
   NéST    > -éST,ESEN
   NéST    > -éST,ESENA
   NéST    > -éST,ESENO
   NéST    > -éST,ESENI
   NéST    > -éST,ESENY
   NéST    > -éST,ESENU
   číST    > -íST,TEN
   číST    > -íST,TENA
   číST    > -íST,TENO
   číST    > -íST,TENI
   číST    > -íST,TENY
   číST    > -íST,TENU
   [DTN]íST    > -íST,ěDEN
   [DTN]íST    > -íST,ěDENA
   [DTN]íST    > -íST,ěDENO
   [DTN]íST    > -íST,ěDENI
   [DTN]íST    > -íST,ěDENY
   [DTN]íST    > -íST,ěDENU
   [^čDTN]íST    > -íST,EDEN
   [^čDTN]íST    > -íST,EDENA
   [^čDTN]íST    > -íST,EDENO
   [^čDTN]íST    > -íST,EDENI
   [^čDTN]íST    > -íST,EDENY
   [^čDTN]íST    > -íST,EDENU
   éZT    > -éZT,EZEN
   éZT    > -éZT,EZENA
   éZT    > -éZT,EZENO
   éZT    > -éZT,EZENI
   éZT    > -éZT,EZENY
   éZT    > -éZT,EZENU
   [^DNT]IT    > -IT,EN
   [^DNT]IT    > -IT,ENA
   [^DNT]IT    > -IT,ENO
   [^DNT]IT    > -IT,ENI
   [^DNT]IT    > -IT,ENY
   [^DNT]IT    > -IT,ENU
   [DNT]IT    > -IT,ěN
   [DNT]IT    > -IT,ěNA
   [DNT]IT    > -IT,ěNO
   [DNT]IT    > -IT,ěNI
   [DNT]IT    > -IT,ěNY
   [DNT]IT    > -IT,ěNU
   AT    > -AT,áN
   AT    > -AT,áNA
   AT    > -AT,áNO
   AT    > -AT,áNI
   AT    > -AT,áNY
   AT    > -AT,áNU
   [DFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěN
   [DFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěNA
   [DFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěNO
   [DFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěNI
   [DFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěNY
   [DFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěNU
   [^DFMNPTVWčšž]íT    > -íT,EN
   [^DFMNPTVWčšž]íT    > -íT,ENA
   [^DFMNPTVWčšž]íT    > -íT,ENO
   [^DFMNPTVWčšž]íT    > -íT,ENI
   [^DFMNPTVWčšž]íT    > -íT,ENY
   [^DFMNPTVWčšž]íT    > -íT,ENU
   [šž]íT    > -íT,IT
   [šž]íT    > -íT,ITA
   [šž]íT    > -íT,ITO
   [šž]íT    > -íT,ITI
   [šž]íT    > -íT,ITY
   [šž]íT    > -íT,ITU
   číT    > -íT,AT
   číT    > -íT,ATA
   číT    > -íT,ATO
   číT    > -íT,ATI
   číT    > -íT,ATY
   číT    > -íT,ATU
   OUT    > -OUT,UT
   OUT    > -OUT,UTA
   OUT    > -OUT,UTO
   OUT    > -OUT,UTI
   OUT    > -OUT,UTY
   OUT    > -OUT,UTU
   ýT    > -ýT,YT
   ýT    > -ýT,YTA
   ýT    > -ýT,YTO
   ýT    > -ýT,YTI
   ýT    > -ýT,YTY
   ýT    > -ýT,YTU
