root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.dict
aklamovat/ATN
anihilovat/ATN
asistovávat/JTN
balzámovat/ATN
blahopřát/BTN
bonzovat/ATN
bryndat/JTN
cenzurovat/ATN
cukrovat/ATN
čerchovat/ATN
dálnopisovat/AT
dehtovat/ATN
demobilizovávat/JTN
derivovat/ATN
diktovat/ATN
dlabávat/JTN
dobečet/ATN
dobryndat/JTN
docvičovat/ATN
dodělávat/JTN
dodusávat/JTN
doházet/AJTN
dohřešit/ATN
doisolovat/ATN
doklobat/AJTN
dokopávat/JTN
dokřečkovat/ATN
dokypřit/ATN
doloupávat/JTN
dometat/JTN
domývat/JTN
dootevírat/JTN
dopižlat/JTN
doposlechnout/ATN
dopřát/BTN
dorozmazat/ATN
dosídlovat/ATN
dosolovat/ATN
dostřelovat/ATN
doškolit/ATN
došťárat/JTN
dotepat/JTN
dotrhávat/JTN
dovázávat/JTN
dovtipkovat/ATN
dozkoumat/JTN
dožrat/ATN
drolit/ATN
elektrifikovávat/JTN
exkomunikovat/ATN
federalizovat/ATN
fotografovávat/JTN
globalizovat/ATN
havarovat/ATN
hnusit/ATN
hromádkovat/ATN
hyperalergizovat/ATN
chrómovat/ATN
imitovávat/JTN
inhalovávat/JTN
interpretovávat/JTN
ježit/ATN
kandysovat/ATN
klasifikovávat/JTN
knihovat/ATN
kolportovat/ATN
kondensovat/ATN
kontrolovat/ATN
kótovat/ATN
krkat/JTN
křoupávat/JTN
kvedlat/JTN
lapovat/ATN
lhostejnět/JTN
lobbovat/ATN
máchat/JTN
mazat/ATN
mikroprogramovávat/JTN
mokvat/JTN
mučit/ATN
nabarvit/ATN
nabumbat/JTN
načerpávat/JTN
nadělat/JTN
nadout/BTN
nadzvedat/JTN
nahlídnout/ATXN
nachýlit/ATXN
naklepat/AJTN
nakouřit/ATN
nakuřovat/ATN
nalévat/JTN
namapovávat/JTN
namrazit/ATN
napařit/ATN
naplňovat/ATN
napražit/ATN
narychlit/ATN
naskicovat/ATN
naspat/BTN
nastřelovávat/JTN
našít/BTN
naštosovat/ATN
natrávit/ATN
navečeřet/JTN
navštěvovat/ATN
nedat/JT
nosívat/JTN
oběhat/JTN
obhlodat/JTN
obkopat/AJTN
oblézt/ATN
obohacovávat/JTN
obseknout/ATN
obtelefonovat/ATN
obzvláštňovávat/JTN
očišťovat/ATN
odblaňovat/ATN
odčerpat/JTN
oddrolovat/ATN
odevropšťovat/ATN
odhlasovat/ATN
odchovat/JTN
odkazovat/ATN
odkouknout/ATN
odkysličit/ATN
odlítávat/JTN
odměřovávat/JTN
odnaučovat/ATN
odpínat/JTN
odpojovávat/JTN
odpřisáhnout/ATN
odřazovat/ATN
odslovenštit/ATN
odstrouhat/JTN
odškrábat/AJTN
odtajovat/ATN
odtušit/ATN
odvinovat/ATN
odzdobit/ATN
ohlašovávat/JTN
ohřebit/ATN
oklepat/AJTN
okrádat/JTN
olepovat/ATN
omilostňovat/ATN
opálit/ATN
opilovat/ATN
opomíjet/JTN
opřipomínkovat/ATN
osahávat/JTN
oslnit/ATN
ostřihávat/JTN
oškrábnout/ATN
otipovat/ATN
otužit/ATN
ozařovat/ATN
ožebračit/ATN
pamatovávat/JTN
pasírovávat/JTN
penzionovat/ATN
pitvávat/JTN
plundrovat/ATN
pobrnkávat/JTN
počítat/JTN
poděkovat/ATN
podchytnout/ATN
podmazávat/JTN
podporovat/ATN
podstavovat/ATN
podvolit/ATN
pohoršovat/ATN
pochroumat/JTN
pokládat/JTN
pokrýt/BTN
polevit/ATN
poměřit/ATN
ponižovat/ATN
popíjet/JTN
popravit/ATN
porušit/ATN
poskytnout/ATN
postrkávat/JTN
posypat/AJTN
potečkovat/ATN
potvrzovat/ATN
povléct/ATN
pozapomenout/ATN
poztrácet/AJTN
pravit/ATN
problematizovat/ATN
proclívat/JTN
prodělávat/JTN
profesionalizovat/ATN
prohlodat/JTN
prohýřit/ATN
prokládat/JTN
prokoulet/AJTN
prokypřovávat/JTN
promačkávat/JTN
promodlit/ATN
propalovávat/JTN
proplít/IT
prorokovat/ATN
prosloužit/ATN
prostřihat/JTN
proškrábat/AJTN
protápět/JTN
protřepat/AJTN
provířit/ATN
prozobat/AJTN
přebásňovat/ATN
přečárat/JTN
předčesávat/JTN
předfinancovávat/JTN
předkrajovávat/JTN
předplácet/JTN
předskakovávat/JTN
předupravovat/ATN
přefiltrovat/ATN
přehlušovat/ATN
přechválit/ATN
překlimbat/JTN
překousávat/JTN
překupovat/ATN
přelíčit/ATN
přeměřit/ATN
přeobjednávat/JTN
přepíjet/JTN
přeposílat/JTN
přeručkovat/ATN
přesídlovávat/JTN
přestěhovávat/JTN
přesypat/AJTN
přeštípat/AJTN
přetočit/ATN
převálet/JTN
převrstvovat/ATN
přežehlit/ATN
přicpávat/JTN
přiházet/AJTN
přikapávat/JTN
přikrašlovat/ATN
přilétat/JTN
přimontovat/ATN
připevnit/ATN
připomínat/JTN
přiskákat/ATN
přistřelovat/ATN
přišpendlit/ATN
přiťuknout/ATN
přivolávat/JTN
publikovávat/JTN
ranit/ATN
reflektovávat/JTN
rekultivovat/ATN
resetovat/ATN
robit/ATN
rozblikat/JTN
rozcmrndávat/JTN
rozdělit/ATN
rozdvojovat/ATN
rozeskočit/ATN
rozfofrovat/ATN
rozhořet/ATN
rozječet/ATN
rozkokrhat/JTN
rozkročit/ATN
rozlepit/ATN
rozmáchnout/ATN
rozmlsat/JTN
rozohňovat/ATN
rozpitvávat/JTN
rozpoutat/JTN
rozrastrovat/ATN
rozseknout/ATN
rozsynchronizovat/ATN
rozšněrovávat/JTN
roztínat/JTN
rozutíkat/JTN
rozvibrovat/ATN
rozzpívat/JTN
rvát/AT
řvát/AT
sbratřovávat/JTN
sebíhat/JTN
sepisovat/ATN
sesmekávat/JTN
sesypat/AJTN
sešrotovávat/JTN
sežrat/ATN
schlamstnout/ATN
sjednocovat/ATN
sklízet/JTN
skrývat/JTN
slézt/ATN
smáčet/AJTN
smiřovat/ATN
snovat/ATN
spájet/JTN
splácenější/YTW
spoluformovávat/JTN
spoluzajišťovat/AT
srovnat/JTN
stěsnat/JTN
stránkovat/ATN
střídat/JTN
sumírovat/ATN
svěšovat/ATN
syslit/ATN
šinout/ATN
šmelit/ATN
švitořit/ATN
tížit/ATN
trylkovat/ATN
ubrnkávat/JTN
udusávat/JTN
ukazovat/ATN
ulamovat/ATN
umýt/BTN
upoutat/JTN
usídlovat/ATN
ustlat/ITN
utěšit/ATN
uvelebit/ATN
vakuovat/ATN
verbovávat/JTN
vkopnout/ATN
vnořovávat/JTN
vříznout/ATN
všít/BTN
vtrhávat/JTN
vybrnkávat/JTN
vyčítat/JTN
vydrcat/JTN
vyhledávat/JTN
vychrstnout/ATN
vyklonovat/ATN
vykroužit/ATN
vylidnit/ATN
vymínit/ATN
vypáčit/ATN
vyplynout/ATN
vypřahat/JTN
vysedět/ATN
vysoutěžit/ATN
vysušovat/ATN
vyšroubovávat/JTN
vytmelit/ATN
vyvázávat/JTN
vyznačkovávat/JTN
vzepnout/JTN
zabavovat/ATN
zacentrovávat/JTN
zadrmolit/ATN
zahmyzit/ATN
zaisolovávat/JTN
zakolísat/JTN
zaktualizovat/ATN
zaluštit/ATN
zamrzet/ATN
zapasovat/ATN
zapracovat/ATN
zařadit/ACTN
zasrat/ATN
zaškrtávat/JTN
zatemňovat/ATN
zavádět/JTN
zavzdušovat/ATN
zbrušovat/ATN
zdlabovat/ATN
zesílit/ATN
zhasnout/ATN
zintenzivnit/ATN
zkomplikovávat/JTN
zkrvavit/ATN
zmařit/ATN
zmydlit/ATN
znepřesnit/ATN
znovuzbudovat/ATN
zpestřit/ATN
zprofanovat/ATN
zrecenzovat/ATN
ztékat/JTN
zušlechťovat/ATN
zvolit/ATN
